Hawaii statutes.
[§143-2.5] Regulation of other animals.
Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as a limitation on the authority of
the counties to regulate, including by licensure, animals other than dogs. [L
1988, c 270, §2]

Previous
Vol03_Ch0121-0200D
Next